Utah statutes.
58-24b-501.   Unlawful conduct.

In addition to the conduct described in Subsection 58-1-501(1), "unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  practicing physical therapy, unless the person:

(a)  is licensed under this chapter to practice physical therapy and practices within the scope of that license; or

(b)  is exempt from licensure under Section 58-24b-304;

(2)  practicing animal physical therapy, unless the person is:

(a)  authorized to practice animal physical therapy under Section 58-24b-405; or

(b)  authorized to practice animal physical therapy under Subsection 58-24b-304(1)(a), (2), or (3);

(3)  representing oneself as, or using the title of, a physical therapist, unless the person is:

(a)  a licensed physical therapist; or

(b) (i)  licensed as a physical therapist in a jurisdiction other than Utah;

(ii)  does not represent oneself as being a physical therapist licensed in Utah; and

(iii)  exempt from licensure under Section 58-24b-304;

(4)  representing oneself as, or using the title of, a physical therapist assistant, unless the person:

(a)  is a licensed physical therapist assistant; or

(b) (i)  is licensed as a physical therapist assistant in a jurisdiction other than Utah;

(ii)  does not represent oneself as being a physical therapist assistant licensed in Utah; and

(iii)  is exempt from licensure under Section 58-24b-304; and

(5)  conduct designated as "unlawful conduct" by the division, by rule.

